Tennessee, session 114, SB1613.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-7-101, is amended by deleting
subsection (d) and substituting instead:
(d) Each state veterans' home established pursuant to this chapter must be
eligible for and receive the veterans' administration per diem payments available to
qualified residents in accordance with applicable federal regulations.
(e) In addition to providing skilled nursing services, each state veterans' home
may provide and receive payment for other services for the support and care of
honorably discharged veterans who served in the United States armed forces as
authorized by state or federal law.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-7-103(c)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead:
(1) The authority to determine the location and type of the Tennessee state
veterans' homes, facilities, and services. In selecting the sites, preference must be
given to publicly owned land. Land for the sites may be purchased only if suitable
publicly owned land is not available;
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-7-103(c)(8), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-7-104(b)(3), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead:
SB1613
009722
- 1 -

(3) The authority to make and execute contracts and all other instruments
necessary or convenient for the exercise of its powers and functions under this chapter,
including contracts for the operation of the state veterans' homes and the provision of
services. All contracts that pertain to the acquisition and improvement of real property
pursuant to § 4-15-102 must be approved in advance by the state building commission
and must be approved by the board.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-7-108, is amended by deleting the
language "and to further the objectives and purposes of the state veterans' homes" and
substituting instead "and to further the objectives and purposes of the state veterans' homes
and other services".
SECTION 6. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 009722